Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2873.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-44. School air quality.
(a) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Certified testing, adjusting, and balancing technician" means;
(i) A technician, tradesperson, or apprentice certified to perform testing, adjusting, and
balancing of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems by the Associated Air Balance
Council, the National Environmental Balancing Bureau, or the testing, adjusting and balancing
bureau; or
(ii) A person certified to perform ventilation assessments of heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning systems through a certification body accredited in accordance with the ISO/IEC 17024
personnel certification standard.
(2) "HVAC " means heating, ventilation and air conditioning.
(3) "MERV " means minimum efficiency reporting value.
(4) "PM2.5 " means particles less than two and one-half (2.5) micrometers in diameter.
(5) "PM10 " means particles less than ten (10) micrometers in diameter.
(6) "Professional engineering standards" means nationally recognized, science-based
technical standards for the design, operation, maintenance, and performance of indoor spaces,

developed through an accredited consensus process, as in effect at the time the inspection,
evaluation, or work is performed. Relevant standards include, but are not limited to,
ANSI/ASHRAE Standard 62.1 (ventilation for acceptable indoor air quality), ANSI/ASHRAE
Standard 55 (thermal environmental conditions for human occupancy), and ASHRAE Standard 241
(control of infectious aerosols).
(7) "Qualified personnel" means either;
(i) A certified testing, adjusting, and balancing technician; or
(ii) A skilled and trained workforce under the supervision of a certified testing, adjusting,
and balancing technician.
(8) "Skilled and trained workforce" means a workforce, managed in conformance with the
Davis-Bacon Act, 40 U.S.C. §§ 3141 through 3148, in which at least sixty percent (60%) of the
workers are graduates of or registered in and attending an apprenticeship program registered with
the department of labor and training, division of apprenticeship training.
(9) "Verification" means the process of evaluating a system, component, or product to
determine whether it complies with specified requirements, design specifications, or regulations.
(b) The department of health shall establish guidelines for indoor air quality in schools,
including recommended thresholds and/or rates for environmental conditions that directly affect
health and learning. Required areas of focus include:
(1) Temperature;
(2) Humidity;
(3) Carbon dioxide;
(4) PM2.5;
(5) PM10;
(6) Ventilation; and
(7) Filtration.
(c) The department of education school building authority, as part of the needs survey
outlined in § 16-105-3, shall expand services to include uniform inspection and evaluation of the
indoor air quality within each school building, including heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems when present. The inspection shall be conducted in conjunction with local school boards,
and shall identify any deficiencies from the department of health recommendations established
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, as well as other conditions that may
affect building performance or occupant health. Implementation of the expanded assessment scope
under this subsection, including HVAC and indoor air quality-related evaluations, shall be subject
to the availability of state funding appropriated for statewide school facility assessments. Inspection
LC005458 - Page 2 of 5

results shall include estimated costs to address identified issues through capital construction,
renovation, maintenance, or other school facility investments, as outlined in §16-105-3. The
inspection and evaluation shall be performed by qualified personnel at least once every five (5)
years. The department of education shall define the assessment procedures and data collection
methods, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Environmental measurements including air temperature, humidity, carbon dioxide,
PM2.5, and PM10 under occupied conditions;
(2) Evaluation of filtration levels and maintenance practices;
(3) Verification of the physical condition and operational performance of ventilation
system components, in accordance with professional engineering standards; and
(4) Verification that required maintenance of ventilation systems has been performed in
accordance with professional engineering standards.
(d) The department of education shall make the inspection and evaluation results easily
available online and send the test results directly to:
(1) Each school's principal;
(2) The department of elementary and secondary education; and
(3) The appropriate local school board.
(e) All schools with HVAC systems shall install filtration that achieves MERV levels of
thirteen (13) to the extent determined to be feasible and appropriate for the existing HVAC system,
as determined by the school board, in accordance with the latest professional engineering standards
and recommendations. If it is determined by the school board that the existing HVAC system is not
designed to achieve MERV levels of thirteen (13), the school shall install filtration that achieves
the highest level feasible without significantly reducing the lifespan or performance of the existing
HVAC system. School personnel shall inspect and replace filters as recommended by manufacturer
guidelines. All HVAC adjustments shall be performed by qualified personnel.
(f) The department of education, in coordination with the department of health, shall submit
a report to the general assembly within one year of the effective date of this section with
recommendations to improve indoor air quality in public schools. The report shall provide an
update on indoor air quality procedures, guidelines, and best practices, along with the status of
funding necessary to support expanded indoor air quality and HVAC improvements and
assessments in schools. The report shall also utilize data collected as part of the needs survey
outlined in §16-105-3. Thereafter, the needs survey and corresponding report shall be conducted
on a five (5) year cycle, consistent with § 16-105-3, subject to the availability of funding.
(g) The department of education shall designate and publicly identify a point of contact to
LC005458 - Page 3 of 5

receive and respond to concerns related to indoor air quality and ventilation systems in public
schools.
(h) The department of health and department of education are hereby authorized to
promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005458
========
LC005458 - Page 4 of 5